Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2058.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 13.10. Regulation of Kratom.--(a) A processor or retailer that sells, provides or distributes a kratom product in this Commonwealth shall register with the department and renew the registration annually. A processor or retailer that is not registered with the department under this subsection may not 123456789101112131415161718192021 sell, provide or distribute a kratom product in this Commonwealth.(b) The department shall establish fees for initial registration and annual renewal, which shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the the Pennsylvania Bulletin. Fees collected for initial registration and annual renewal under this subsection shall be deposited into a restricted account within the General Fund to be used exclusively by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs for addiction treatment and recovery services.(c) A processor or retailer may not sell, provide or distribute a kratom product:(1) to an individual under 21 years of age; or(2) that meets any of the following criteria:(i) is mixed or packed with a nonkratom substance, which affects the quality or strength of the kratom product to such a degree as to render the kratom product injurious to a consumer of the kratom product; or(ii) contains a poisonous or otherwise deleterious nonkratom ingredient, including:(A) a controlled substance listed under section 4 or 28 Pa. Code Ch. 25 Subch. A (relating to controlled substances, drugs, devices and cosmetics); or(B) a substance temporarily scheduled as a controlled substance by the secretary under section 3(d);(iii) contains a kratom extract with residual solvent levels exceeding the standards specified in the most recent edition of the United States Pharmacopeia (USP 48-NF 43) published as of the effective date of this section;20250HB2058PN2642 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) contains a level of 7-hydroxymitragynine in the alkaloid fraction exceeding 2% of the total alkaloid composition of the kratom product;(v) contains a synthetic alkaloid, including synthetic mitragynine, synthetic 7-hydroxymitragynine or any other synthetically derived compound of the kratom plant; or(vi) lacks adequate labeling of ingredients and directions necessary for the safe and effective use of the kratom product by a consumer in accordance with subsection (e).(d) A processor or retailer may not sell, provide, distribute or advertise a kratom product in a manner that is attractive to children.(e) A processor or retailer shall ensure that a kratom product bears a label that includes, at a minimum, the following information:(1) The name and address of the processor responsible for manufacturing, packaging, labeling or distributing the kratom product.(2) A complete list of ingredients and the quantity of each ingredient in the kratom product.(3) The following recommendations and advisories:(i) The kratom product is not recommended for individuals under 21 years of age, pregnant or breastfeeding.(ii) Consultation with a health care professional is advised before use of the kratom product.(iii) Kratom may be habit-forming and may interact with certain medications.(iv) Kratom overdose may occur, with symptoms resembling opioid overdose.(4) Directions for use, including the recommended serving 20250HB2058PN2642 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 size, the maximum number of servings per 24-hour period and the amount of mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine per serving.(5) The following disclosures regarding the information under this subsection and the kratom product:(i) "These statements have not been evaluated by the United States Food and Drug Administration. This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure or prevent any disease."(ii) "Keep out of reach of children."(6) Any other information deemed necessary by the department.(f) A retailer shall store kratom products in a manner that restricts access to authorized personnel and prevents self-service by consumers, including storing kratom products in an area behind a counter at the retailer's place of business in a secured display that is only accessible by authorized personnel.(g) Before selling a kratom product to an individual who appears to be under 35 years of age, a retailer shall verify the individual's age using a transaction scan device or an acceptable form of identification. Data collected from a transaction scan device may not be sold or shared, except to demonstrate compliance with this act to law enforcement.(h) A retailer may not:(1) sell, provide or distribute a kratom product from a location visible from a school entity or licensed daycare facility; or(2) use illuminated signs or brightly colored advertisements to promote kratom products.(i) Within two years of the effective date of this section, the department shall conduct a study on the effects and addictiveness of kratom products and submit a report to the 20250HB2058PN2642 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(j) Based on the conclusions of the report under subsection (i), the department shall develop and implement an educational campaign to inform residents of this Commonwealth about the dangers associated with kratom use.(k) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Attractive to children." Any of the following:(1) Use of images appealing to children, including cartoons, toys, robots, real or fictional humans, fictional animals or creatures or fruits and vegetables, except when accurately describing ingredients or flavors, unless part of required health warnings.(2) Likeness to images, characters or phrases commonly used to advertise to children.(3) Imitation of packaging or labeling for candy, cereals, sweets, chips or other food products typically marketed to children.(4) Use of the terms "candy," "candies" or variants such as "kandy" or "kandee."(5) Brand names or imitations of brand names of candies, cereals, sweets, chips or other food products typically marketed to children.(6) Packaging or images easily confused with commercially 20250HB2058PN2642 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available foods not containing kratom and typically marketed to children.(7) Any other feature that, under the totality of circumstances, is likely to appeal to children."Food product." A food, food ingredient, dietary ingredient, dietary supplement or beverage intended for human consumption."Kratom." The plant Mitragyna speciosa or any part thereof, including all naturally occurring components."Kratom extract." A food product containing any part of a leaf from Mitragyna speciosa that has been extracted and concentrated to provide standardized dosing."Kratom product." A food product containing any part of a leaf from Mitragyna speciosa or a kratom extract, manufactured as a powder, capsule, pill, beverage or other edible form."Processor." A person who prepares or manufactures a kratom product or who advertises or represents themselves as preparing or manufacturing a kratom product. The term does not include a retailer."Retailer." A person who sells or distributes a kratom product or who advertises or holds oneself out as selling or distributing a kratom product. The term does not include a processor."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Transaction scan device." A device capable of deciphering, in an electronically readable format, the information encoded on the magnetic strip or bar code of an identification card.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2058PN2642 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829